test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-allnouns_gt-norm.yaml
     esa+N+AN+Obv: esa
     esa+N+AN+Loc: esihk
     esa+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitesimihk
     esa+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitesimihk
     esa+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otesimihk
     esa+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otesimiyihk
     esa+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitesiminâhk
     esa+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitesiminâhk
     esa+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitesimiwâhk
     esa+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otesimiwâhk
     esa+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otesimiyihk

     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: esis
     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: esisak
     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: esisinâhk

     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicesimisiwâw
     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocesimisiwâwa

  
  Noun - iskwêw - ok : # -m animate noun
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg: iskwêw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl: iskwêwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Loc: iskwênâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Obv: iskwêwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: iskwês
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: iskwêsak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [iskwêsihk, iskwêsinâhk]
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitiskwêm
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitiskwêm
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otiskwêma
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitiskwêminân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitiskwêminaw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitiskwêmiwâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitiskwêmak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitiskwêmak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otiskwêma
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitiskwêminânak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitiskwêminawak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitiskwêmiwâwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niciskwêmis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiciskwêmis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ociskwêmisa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ociskwêmisiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niciskwêmisinân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiciskwêmisinaw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiciskwêmisiwâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ociskwêmisiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ociskwêmisiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niciskwêmisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiciskwêmisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ociskwêmisa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ociskwêmisiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niciskwêmisinânak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiciskwêmisinawak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiciskwêmisiwâwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ociskwêmisiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ociskwêmisiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitiskwêmihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitiskwêmihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otiskwêmihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otiskwêmiyihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitiskwêminâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitiskwêminâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitiskwêmiwâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otiskwêmiwâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otiskwêmiyihk

     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niciskwêmisihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiciskwêmisihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ociskwêmisihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ociskwêmisiyihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: niciskwêmisinâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiciskwêmisinâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiciskwêmisiwâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ociskwêmisiwâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ociskwêmisiyihk

  
  Noun - maniway - ok : # -m inanimate noun
     
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: naniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kaniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: waniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: waniwâyiw
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: naniwânân
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kaniwânaw
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kaniwâyâw #?
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: waniwâyâw #?
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: waniwâyiw
     

  
  Noun - maskisin - ok : # -m inanimate noun, shoe
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg: maskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl: maskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Loc: maskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: maskisinis
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: maskisinisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: maskisinisihk
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: omaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: omaskisiniyiw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nimaskisininân
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kimaskisininaw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kimaskisiniwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: omaskisiniwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: omaskisiniyiw
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nimaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kimaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: omaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: omaskisiniyiwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nimaskisininâna
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kimaskisininawa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kimaskisiniwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: omaskisiniwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: omaskisiniyiwa
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimaskisinis
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimaskisinis
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: omaskisinis
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: omaskisinisiyiw
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nimaskisinisinân
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kimaskisinisinaw
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kimaskisinisiwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: omaskisinisiwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: omaskisinisiyiw
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nimaskisinisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kimaskisinisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: omaskisinisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: omaskisinisiyiwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nimaskisinisinâna
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kimaskisinisinawa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kimaskisinisiwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: omaskisinisiwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: omaskisinisiyiwa
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nimaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kimaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: omaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: omaskisiniyihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nimaskisininâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kimaskisininâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kimaskisiniwâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: omaskisiniwâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: omaskisiniyihk

     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nimaskisinisihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kimaskisinisihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: omaskisinisihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: omaskisinisiyihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nimaskisinisinâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kimaskisinisinâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kimaskisinisiwâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: omaskisinisiwâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: omaskisinisiyihk
  
  Noun - mîpit - ok : # -m inanimate noun
     
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nîpit
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kîpit
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: wîpit
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: wîpitiyiw
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nîpitinân
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kîpitinaw
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kîpitiwâw
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: wîpitiwâw
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: wîpitiyiw

     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nîpita
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kîpita
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: wîpita
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: wîpitiyiwa
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nîpitinâna
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kîpitinawa
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kîpitiwâwa
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: wîpitiwâwa
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: wîpitiyiwa

  
  Noun - mispiton - ok : # -m inanimate noun
     
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nispiton
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kispiton
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ospiton
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: ospitoniyiw
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nispitoninân
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kispitoninaw
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kispitoniwâw
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: ospitoniwâw
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: ospitoniyiw

     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nispitona
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kispitona
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: ospitona
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: ospitoniyiwa
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nispitoninâna
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kispitoninawa
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kispitoniwâwa
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: ospitoniwâwa
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: ospitoniyiwa

  
  Noun - niska - ok : # -m animate noun, Canada goose, acc. Wolvengrey
     niska+N+AN+Sg: niska
     niska+N+AN+Pl: niskak
     niska+N+AN+Loc: niskohk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: niskisis # also niskisis
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: niskisisak # also niskisisak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [niskisisinâhk, niskisisihk]

     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niniskim
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiniskim
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskima
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: oniskimiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niniskiminân
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniskiminaw
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskimiwâw
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: oniskimiyiwa

     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niniskimak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiniskimak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskima
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: oniskimiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niniskiminânak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiniskiminawak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiniskimiwâwak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: oniskimiyiwa

     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niniskimisis
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiniskimisis
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskimisisa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: oniskimisisiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niniskimisisinân
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniskimisisinaw
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskimisisiwâw
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimisisiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: oniskimisisiyiwa
 
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niniskimisisak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiniskimisisak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskimisisa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: oniskimisisiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niniskimisisinânak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiniskimisisinawak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiniskimisisiwâwak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimisisiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: oniskimisisiyiwa
     

  
  Noun - ôhow - ok : # -m animate noun, owl
     ôhow+N+AN+Sg: ôhow
     ôhow+N+AN+Pl: ôhowak 
     ôhow+N+AN+Loc: ôhonâhk # ôhônâhk
     ôhow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: ôhosis # ôhôsis
     ôhow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: ôhosisak # ôhôsisak
     ôhow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [ôhosisinâhk, ôhosisihk]

  
  Noun - okimâw - ok : # -m animate noun, chief, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 135
